src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Low German language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
+N: # ;

LEXICON n1
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:     #   ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:     #   ;
+N+Neu: pl ;


LEXICON pl
+Pl+Nom:%>en # ;
+Pl+Acc:%>en # ;
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
